Colorado, session 2026A, HB1027.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-51-1101, amend
(1.9)(a)(I), (1.9)(a)(II)(B), (1.9)(a)(II)(C), and (1.9)(h); and add (1.9)(k) as
follows:
24-51-1101. Employment after service retirement - report -
definitions - repeal.
(1.9) (a) (I) Subject to subsection (1.9)(h) of this section, a service
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

retiree who is a superintendent; a principal; a teacher; a school bus driver;
a school food services cook; a school nurse; or a paraprofessional, as
defined in section 22-60.3-201; OR A BOCES EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, and is
hired pursuant to subsection (1.9)(b) of this section by an employer in the
school division of the association that satisfies the criteria specified in
subsection (1.9)(a)(II) of this section may receive salary without reduction
in benefits for any length of employment in a calendar year if the service
retiree has not worked for an employer, as defined in section 24-51-101
(20), during the month of the effective date of retirement. A service retiree
described in this subsection (1.9)(a) who works for an employer, as defined
in section 24-51-101 (20), during the month of the effective date of
retirement is subject to a reduction in benefits as provided in section
24-51-1102 (2).
(II) The provisions of this subsection (1.9) apply only if:
(B) The school district, board of cooperative services, or charter
school hires the service retiree for the purpose of providing classroom
instruction or school bus transportation to students enrolled by the district,
enrolled by one or more of the districts served by the board of cooperative
services, or enrolled by the charter school, or for the purpose of being a
superintendent; a principal; a school food services cook; a school nurse; or
a paraprofessional, as defined in section 22-60.3-201; OR A BOCES
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR; and
(C) The school district, board of cooperative services, or charter
school determines that there is a critical shortage of qualified
superintendents; principals; teachers; school bus drivers; school food
services cooks; school nurses; or paraprofessionals, as defined in section
22-60.3-201; OR BOCES EXECUTIVE DIRECTORS, as applicable, and that the
service retiree has specific experience, skills, or qualifications that would
benefit the district, board of cooperative services, or charter school.
(h) A teacher, school bus driver, school food services cook, school
nurse, superintendent, principal, or qualified paraprofessional, OR BOCES
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR who retires before he or she has THEY HAVE met the
age and service credit requirements for full service retirement benefits
pursuant to section 24-51-602 shall not be employed after retirement
pursuant to this subsection (1.9) by the employer in the school division that
was the teacher's, school bus driver's, school food services cook's, school
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1027

nurse's, superintendent's, principal's, or qualified paraprofessional's, OR
BOCES EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S last employer until two years after the
teacher's, school bus driver's, school food services cook's, school nurse's,
superintendent's, principal's, or qualified paraprofessional's, OR BOCES
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S date of retirement.
(k) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (1.9), UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES, "BOCES EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR" MEANS AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS EXECUTIVE AUTHORITY FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF
A BOARD OF COOPERATIVE SERVICES.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-54-203, add (3)(c)
as follows:
22-54-203. Start-up funding - rules - repeal.
(3) (c) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER MAY ELECT TO HAVE SOME OR
ALL OF ITS DISTRIBUTION MADE DIRECTLY TO A BOARD OF COOPERATIVE
SERVICES.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-54-205, add (3)(c)
as follows:
22-54-205. Sustain funding - rules - repeal.
(3) (c) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER MAY ELECT TO HAVE SOME OR
ALL OF ITS DISTRIBUTION MADE DIRECTLY TO A BOARD OF COOPERATIVE
SERVICES.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1027

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1027